Utah statutes.
19-6-412.   Petroleum storage tank -- Certificate of compliance.
(1) (a)  Beginning July 1, 1990, an owner or operator of a petroleum storage
tank may obtain a certificate of compliance for the facility.
(b)  Effective July 1, 1991, each owner or operator of a petroleum storage
tank shall have a certificate of compliance for the facility.
(2)  The executive secretary shall issue a certificate of compliance if:
(a)  the owner or operator has a certificate of registration;
(b) the owner or operator demonstrates it is participating in the
Environmental Assurance Program under Section 19-6-410.5, or otherwise
demonstrates compliance with financial assurance requirements as defined by
rule;
(c)  all state and federal statutes, rules, and regulations have been
substantially complied with; and
(d)  all tank test requirements of Section 19-6-413 have been met.
(3)  If the ownership of or responsibility for the petroleum storage tank
changes, the certificate of compliance is still valid unless it has been
revoked or has lapsed.
(4)  The executive secretary may issue a certificate of compliance for a
period of less than one year to maintain an administrative schedule of
certification.
(5)  The executive secretary shall reissue a certificate of compliance if the
owner or operator of an underground storage tank has complied with the
requirements of Subsection (2).
(6)  If the owner or operator electing to participate in the program has a
number of tanks in an area where the executive secretary finds it would be
difficult to accurately determine which of the tanks may be the source of a
release, the owner may only elect to place all of the tanks in the area in the
program, but not just some of the tanks in the area.
